Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXVI Statutory Actions and Limitations
Civil Liability for Theft of Motor Fuel

411.400.
Definitions for KRS 411.400 to 411.406.

As used in KRS

411.400

to

411.406

, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

“Motor fuel” has the same meaning as in KRS

363.900

;

“Retailer” means any person, firm, or corporation who sells or offers for sale motor fuel from a retail facility;

“Retail facility” has the same meaning as in KRS

363.900

; and

“Vehicle” means a “motor vehicle” as defined by KRS

138.210

or a “motorboat” as defined by KRS

235.010

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2008, ch. 110, § 1, effective July 15, 2008.

411.402.
Civil liability for theft of motor fuel — Penalties — Notice of nonpayment.

The owner of a vehicle that receives motor fuel from a retail facility without making proper payment is liable to the retailer for the price of the motor fuel received, in addition to a service charge of thirty dollars ($30). This service charge may be imposed when notice is mailed under subsection (3) of this section, if the notice of the service charge was conspicuously displayed on the premises from which the motor fuel was received. The notice shall include a statement that civil penalties will be imposed if payment is not received within thirty (30) days. Only one (1) service charge may be imposed under this section for each incident.

If the price of the motor fuel received and the service charge are not paid within thirty (30) days after the retailer has mailed the notice under subsection (3) of this section, the owner is liable to the retailer for:

The price of the motor fuel received;

The service charge as provided in subsection (1) of this section; and

A civil penalty in the amount of the greater of:

The price of the motor fuel received; or

One hundred dollars ($100).

Notice of nonpayment that includes a copy of KRS

411.400

to

411.406

and a description of its penalties shall be sent by the retailer to the owner by certified mail, to the address indicated by records obtained under KRS

411.406

. The notice shall include a signed statement by the retailer or the employee of the retailer who reported the act, surveillance video photographs or other photographic evidence, the date and time of the occurrence, and the license plate number of the vehicle.

If within the thirty (30) day period referred to in subsection (2) of this section the owner sends written notice to the retailer disputing the retailer’s claim that the owner received motor fuel from the retailer without making proper payment, the retailer may collect the price of the motor fuel in accordance with KRS

411.404

. Upon receipt of this notice from the owner, the retailer shall cease all collection efforts.

History.

Enact. Acts 2008, ch. 110, § 2, effective July 15, 2008.

411.404.
Liability under KRS 411.402 not a bar to other liability.

Civil liability under KRS

411.402

does not preclude civil liability under KRS

411.095

, criminal liability under KRS

514.030

, or liability under any other applicable law.

History.

Enact. Acts 2008, ch. 110, § 3, effective July 15, 2008.

411.406.
Administrative regulations to implement vehicle owner identification system.

The Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations to implement a system by which a retailer or association of retailers may obtain the name and mailing address of any owner who has been identified as committing an offense under KRS

411.402

. The cabinet may enter into an agreement with a retailer or association of retailers to establish a set fee or other negotiated terms for the release of owner records.

Any information released by the cabinet under this section shall be consistent with its authority under KRS

187.310

and shall be in compliance with 18

U.S.C. secs. 2721

et seq. The cabinet may integrate any system established under KRS

411.400

to

411.406

with its existing programs for the release of information pursuant to KRS Chapter 187.

History.

Enact. Acts 2008, ch. 110, § 4, effective July 15, 2008.